Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3160.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-13.11 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-13.11. Qualifying low-income housing — Assessment and taxation.
(a) Any residential rental property that has been issued an occupancy permit on or after
January 1, 1995, after substantial rehabilitation as defined by the U.S. Department of Housing and
Urban Development and is encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a
governmental unit or Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation restricting either or
both the rents that may be charged to tenants of the property or the incomes of the occupants of the
property, is subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of the property’s previous years’ gross
scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined by each municipality.; provided:
(1) At least forty percent (40%) of the rental dwelling units in the property are encumbered
by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a governmental unit or Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation resulting in monthly housing costs (rent and utilities) that do not
exceed thirty percent (30%) of the gross income of a household at or below eighty percent (80%)
statewide area median income, adjusted for metropolitan statistical area and family size; or
(2) At least thirty percent (30%) of the rental dwelling units in the property are encumbered
by a covenant recorded in the land records in favor of a governmental unit or Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation resulting in monthly housing costs (rent and utilities) that do not
exceed thirty percent (30%) of the gross income of a household at or below sixty percent (60%)

statewide area median income, adjusted for metropolitan statistical area and family size.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (a)(1) and (2) of this section, any residential rental unit or
units that meet the definition of low- and moderate-income housing under chapter 53 of title 45
("low and moderate income housing") are subject to a tax that equals eight percent (8%) of those
units’ previous year's gross scheduled rental income or a lesser percentage as determined by the
municipality, with the remainder of the property taxed pursuant to applicable law.
(b) Any residential rental housing that is created by converting an existing building from
non-residential use, prior to the expiration or repeal of this section, that building is:
(1) Comprised of no less than:
(i) Ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq ft); or
(ii) Ten (10) residential dwelling units, two (2) of which are at least ten percent (10%) of
the rental dwelling units on the property and at levels affordable to households at or below one
hundred twenty percent (120%) statewide area median income, and three (3) issued an occupancy
permit, shall be subject to a fixed percentage of the prior year’s gross scheduled rental income for
the following thirty (30) years as outlined below:
Year Schedule
1 8%
2 8%
3 8%
4 8%
5 8%
6 8%
7 8%
8 8%
9 8%
10 8%
11 8%
12 8%
13 8%
14 8%
15 8%
16 10%
17 10%
18 10%
LC005866 - Page 2 of 6

19 10%
20 10%
21 12%
22 12%
23 12%
24 12%
25 12%
26 12%
27 12%
28 12%
29 12%
30 12%
(c) The term “residential property” as used in this section shall include all portions of a
building used for residential purposes and shall not include any portion of a mixed-use building
that is not used as a residence or in service of a residence. In all instances where a property is taxed
pursuant to this section, property owners shall provide the local assessor annually a certified
residential rent roll of the property reflecting each dwelling unit and the gross rental income for
each unit in the property, and for buildings comprised in part of non-residential uses, evidence
deemed necessary by the local assessor to demonstrate the fractional portion of each property that
should be taxed at the appropriate non-residential rate. The assessor shall then tax the residential
portion at the appropriate rate set in subsections (a) or (b) of this section, and the remainder at the
appropriate non-residential rate.
(d) Residential property created by converting an existing building from non-residential
use shall conform to the following standards and requirements:
(1) Responsible contracting compliance. The taxpayer utilizing the tax treatment of this
section shall ensure that any contractor and/or subcontractors on this residential property shall:
(i) Have all valid and effective registrations and/or licenses required in order to carry out
their construction contracts;
(ii) Ensure that all craft labor employed on the residential property have completed at least
an OSHA ten (10) hour training course for safety established by the U.S. Department of Labor,
Occupational Safety & Health Administration;
(iii) Comply with all state, federal and local laws including, but not limited to, providing
workers’ compensation insurance, prompt payment of wages and benefits, and proper classification
of workers and employees as employees as opposed to independent contractors;
LC005866 - Page 3 of 6

(iv) Any person that does not have a current registration with the State of Rhode Island
contractors’ registration and licensing board and a properly filed a notice of designation as an
independent contractor pursuant to § 28-29-17.1 shall be presumed to be an employee;
(v) A person shall only be considered an independent contractor if, when they are
performing work at the site they are free from direct control and direction in connection with
completing their scope of work, both under their contract (if there is one) and in fact;
(vi) Not hire and/or utilize any contractor or subcontractor that has:
(A) Been debarred or suspended by any federal, state or local government agency or
authority in the past three (3) years;
(B) Any type of business, contracting or trade license, registration, or other certification
revoked or suspended in the past three (3) years; and
(C) Been found in violation of any tax laws, prompt payment laws, wage and hour laws,
prevailing wage laws, environmental laws or others, where the result of such violation was the
payment of a fine, back pay damages or any other type of penalty in the amount of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or more within the last five (5) years.
(2) Registered apprenticeship program. Where the budget for the hard costs of the
residential property is in excess ten million dollars ($10,000,000), the taxpayer shall ensure that
one hundred percent (100%) of the hours worked on the residential property shall be performed by
all trade construction contractors and subcontractors who have or are affiliated with an
apprenticeship program as defined in 29 C.F.R. § 29.1 through 29.14 for craft labor employed.
Additionally, the taxpayer shall ensure that all bidding documents for the work to be performed on
the residential property includes express and conspicuous language evidencing the requirement
found in this subsection. As part of its contract with the construction manager and/or general
contractor, the taxpayer shall require that not less than ten percent (10%) of the total hours worked
by the contractors’ and subcontractors' employees on the residential property are completed by
apprentices registered in the aforementioned apprenticeship programs.
(3) Prevailing wage. Where the budget for the hard costs of the residential property is in
excess of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), all construction workers on that project
providing services in connection with the residential property shall be paid in accordance with the
wages and benefits required pursuant to chapter 13 of title 37 ("labor and payment of debts by
contractors") and all contractors and subcontractors shall file certified payrolls on a monthly basis
for all work completed in the preceding month on a uniform form prescribed by the director of
labor and training (the “prevailing wage requirements”). Failure to follow the prevailing wage
requirements shall constitute a material violation and a material breach of this section and the
LC005866 - Page 4 of 6

residential property shall not remain eligible for tax treatment under this section.
(4) Confirmation of compliance. Tax treatment pursuant to this section shall not be
provided by the municipality unless the municipal tax assessor receives confirmation from the
department of labor and training that there has been compliance with the responsible contracting
standards, registered apprenticeship and prevailing wage requirements set forth in this section.
Failure to follow responsible contracting standards, registered apprenticeship and the prevailing
wage requirements imposed in this section shall constitute a material violation and a material
breach of this section and shall require the pending tax treatment to be revoked and/or not awarded.
(e) For those properties that have been taxed under this section by a municipality as of
December 31, 2024, the manner in which the municipality has applied this statute in the past shall
continue receiving any previously established tax rate unless the property owner affirmatively
rejects the same. Said prior tax treatment is transferable to any subsequent property owner if the
conditions of the tax treatment are met by the new owner to the satisfaction of the assessor.
(f) Creating low-income housing and creating new housing through adaptive reuse are
matters of state-wide concern. For that reason, no city or town shall have the authority to tax
properties qualifying for and utilizing this section at any rate higher than otherwise provided for in
this section.
(g) Subsection (b) of this section shall expire and be deemed repealed for residential rental
housing not created as of July 1, 2037.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005866
========
LC005866 - Page 5 of 6